District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

39-121

Takoma Park branch — Hours.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 943, ch. 150, § 1
Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-17, § 3, 32 DCR 3582

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 37-107.
1973 Ed., § 37-107.